North Dakota, session 69, HB1361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 12.1-41 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Prohibited acts - Mandatory terms of imprisonment .
A person who violates a provision of this chapter is subject to mandatory minimum sentencing
requirements to be served without the benefit of parole as follows:
1. For a class AA felony, the court shall impose a minimum sentence of twenty years '
imprisonment.
2. For a class A felony, the court shall impose a minimum sentence of ten years' imprisonment .
3. For a class B felony, the court shall impose a minimum sentence of five years' imprisonment .

H. B. NO. 1361 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1361.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 4 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State